North Carolina, session 2025, HB1187.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to G.S. 150B-21.3(b1), the amendment to 15A NCAC 07H
.0314 (Installation and Maintenance of Wheat Straw Bales for Sand Fencing in Ocean Hazard
Areas), as adopted by the North Carolina Coastal Resources Commission on April 30, 2025, and
approved by the Rules Review Commission on June 26, 2025, is disapproved.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H1187-v-1*